DTC P0629 [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]
id0102f1955300
DTC P0629 |
Suction control valve circuit high input |
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DETECTION CONDITION
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• The PCM monitors the suction control valve circuit current while the engine is running. If the PCM detects circuit current is more than 2.7 A when the suction control valve is off, the PCM determines that there is the malfunction in the suction control valve circuit.
Diagnostic support note
• The MIL illuminates if the PCM detects the above malfunction condition in the first drive cycle.
• FREEZE FRAME DATA is available.
• The DTC is stored in the PCM memory.
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POSSIBLE CAUSE
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• Suction control valve malfunction
• Connector or terminal malfunction
• Short to power supply in wiring harness between suction control valve terminal A and PCM terminal 10
• Short to power supply in wiring harness between suction control valve terminal B and PCM terminal 29
• PCM malfunction
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Diagnostic procedure
STEP |
INSPECTION |
ACTION |
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1
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VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
• Has FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
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2
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VERIFY RELATED REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
• Verify related Service Information availability.
• Is any related repair information available?
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Yes
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Perform repair or diagnosis according to the available Service Information.
• If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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3
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VERIFY CURRENT SIGNAL STATUS: IS CONCERN INTERMITTENT OR CONSTANT?
• Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
• Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
• Start the engine.
• Is the same DTC present?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Intermittent concern exists.
Perform the “INTERMITTENT CONCERN TROUBLESHOOTING”.
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4
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INSPECT SUCTION CONTROL VALVE CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
• Turn the engine switch off.
• Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged/pulled-out terminals, corrosion).
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the suspected terminal, go to Step 8.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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5
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INSPECT SUCTION CONTROL VALVE CIRCUIT FOR SHORT TO POWER SUPPLY
• Turn the engine switch to the ON position (Engine off).
• Inspected the voltage between the following terminals and body ground:
• Is the voltage less than 1.0 V?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Repair or replace the wiring harness for a short to power supply, go to Step 8.
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6
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INSPECT SUCTION CONTROL VALVE
• Inspect the suction control valve.
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair the supply pump, go to Step 8.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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7
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INSPECT PCM CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
• Turn the engine switch off.
• Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged/pulled-out terminals, corrosion).
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the suspected terminal, go to Step 8.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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8
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VERIFY TROUBLESHOOTING OF DTC P0629 COMPLETED
• Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
• Start the engine.
• Is the same DTC present?
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Yes
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Replace the PCM, go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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9
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VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
• Perform the Repair Verification Drive Mode.
• Are any DTCs present?
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Yes
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Go to the applicable DTC inspection.
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No
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Troubleshooting completed.
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